District of Columbia statutes.
38-2601

Establishment of the Office of the State Superintendent of Education.

(a)

There is established, under the Office of the Mayor, an Office of the State Superintendent of Education.

(b)

The OSSE shall be headed by a State Superintendent of Education, who shall be appointed by the Mayor with the advice and consent of the Council in accordance with § 1-523.01(a). The Officer shall serve a 4-year term.

(c)

The State Superintendent shall serve as the chief state school officer for the District of Columbia and shall represent the OSSE and the District of Columbia in all matters before the United States Department of Education and with other states and educational organizations.

(d)

All operational authority for state-level functions, except that delegated to the State Board of Education in § 38-2652, shall vest in the Office of the State Superintendent of Education under the supervision of the State Superintendent of Education.

Oct. 21, 2000, D.C. Law 13-176, § 2, 47 DCR 6835
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 302(a), 54 DCR 4102
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-84, § 102(a), 61 DCR 178
This section is referenced in § 7-863.03a, § 7-2033.01, § 38-271.01, § 38-1313, § 38-1800.02, § 38-1802.14, § 38-2601.02, and § 38-2605.01.
D.C. Law 17-9 rewrote the section.
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-84 deleted “(‘OSSE’)” following “Education” in (a); and deleted “(‘State Superintendent’)” following “Education” in (b).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2602 of the Fiscal Year 2001 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-438, October 20, 2000, 47 DCR 8740).
For temporary (90 day) transfer to the State Education Office of all positions, personnel, property, records and unexpended balances of funds made available to the Office of Postsecondary Education, Research and Assistance and Tuition Assistance Program, see § 402 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) transfer to the State Education Office of appropriations, allocations, and other funds made available to the State Education Agency—Adult Education through the University of the District of Columbia, see § 602 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 4111, 4171 of Fiscal Year 2010 Budget Support Second Emergency Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-207, October 15, 2009, 56 DCR 8234).
For temporary (90 day) additions, see §§ 4111, 4171 of Fiscal Year Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-260, January 4, 2010, 57 DCR 345).

Short title: Section 4110 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle L of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Accuracy in Public Education Projections Act of 2009”.

Short title: Section 4170 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided that subtitle R of title IV of the act may be cited as the “Child Care Services Act of 2009”.

Sections 402 and 602 of D.C. Law 14-28 provided:

“Sec. 402. (a) All positions, personnel, property, records and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations and other funds available or to be made available to the Office of Postsecondary Education, Research and Assistance and Tuition Assistance Program are hereby transferred to the State Education Office, established by section 2(a) of the State Education Office Establishment Act of 2000, effective October 21, 2000 (D.C. Law 13-176; 47 DCR 6835), effective July 2000.

“(b) All of the functions assigned and authority delegated to the Office of Postsecondary Education, Research and Assistance and Tuition Assistance Program are hereby transferred to the State Education Office, established by D.C. Law 13-176, effective July

Section 4111 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided: “The Office of the State Superintendent, with the participation of the Council, District of Columbia Public Schools, and the Public Charter School Board shall convene a working group that shall develop a uniform method by which enrollment projections will be completed for both public schools and the public charter schools based on empirical and objective data. The methodology shall be developed by a third party that shall be independent of the government of the District of Columbia. The enrollment projections shall include demographic analysis and necessary programmatic factors upon which future budgets shall be based, beginning with the fiscal year 2011 budget.”

Section 4171 of D.C. Law 18-111 provided:

“(a) The Office of the State Superintendent of Education (‘OSSE’) shall continue to provide through the Department of Parks and Recreation direct child care programs, including daycare and early and after school care services at all recreation-based sites, including all sites in the Request for Offers (OPM-RFO-OUT-2009-2) issued by the Office of Property Management, unless a contract for a licensed provider to provide those same services has been executed by the District and, if required by section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), approved by the Council.

“(b) The OSSE shall provide to the Council a comprehensive analysis and plan for child care programs for special needs and developmentally disabled children in fiscal year 2010 by November 15, 2009.”

Office of the State Superintendent of Education Fleet Management and Vehicle Operators Accountability Policies, see Mayor’s Order 2011-46, February 23, 2011 ( 58 DCR 1663).